Massachusetts, session 194th, H1844.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 211 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:—
Section 29. The Board of Bar Overseers shall not assess an annual registration fee for
attorneys who retire from the practice of law, sitting judges, clerk-magistrates, as defined in
Canon 1 of Supreme Judicial Court Rule 3:12, Federal clerks of court, chief deputy clerks and
deputy clerks, employees of the General Court, District Attorneys and their assistants, the
Attorney General and his assistants, attorneys employed by the Committee for Public Counsel
Services, and attorneys employed by the Commonwealth of Massachusetts who do not otherwise
engage in the practice of law.
of 1